Indiana, session 2026, HB1255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-36-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2018,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) If an adult incapable of consenting under
section 4 of this chapter has not appointed a health care representative
under section 7 of this chapter or the health care representative
appointed under section 7 of this chapter is not reasonably available or
declines to act, except as provided in sections 9 and 9.5 of this chapter,
consent to health care may be given in the following order of priority:
(1) A judicially appointed guardian of the person or a
representative appointed under section 8 of this chapter.
(2) A spouse.
(3) An adult child.
(4) A parent.
(5) An adult sibling.
(6) A grandparent.
(7) An adult grandchild.
(8) The nearest other adult relative in the next degree of kinship
2026 IN 1255—LS 6506/DI 104


who is not listed in subdivisions (2) through (7).
(9) A friend who:
(A) is an adult;
(B) has maintained regular contact with the individual; and
(C) is familiar with the individual's activities, health, and
religious or moral beliefs.
(10) The individual's religious superior, if the individual is a
member of a religious order.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (f), consent to health care for
a minor not authorized to consent under section 3 of this chapter may
be given by any of the following:
(1) A judicially appointed guardian of the person or a
representative appointed under section 8 of this chapter.
(2) A parent or an individual in loco parentis if:
(A) there is no guardian or other representative described in
subdivision (1);
(B) the guardian or other representative is not reasonably
available or declines to act; or
(C) the existence of the guardian or other representative is
unknown to the health care provider.
(3) An adult sibling of the minor if:
(A) there is no guardian or other representative described in
subdivision (1);
(B) a parent or an individual in loco parentis is not reasonably
available or declines to act; or
(C) the existence of the parent or individual in loco parentis is
unknown to the health care provider after reasonable efforts
are made by the health care provider to determine whether the
minor has a parent or an individual in loco parentis who is able
to consent to the treatment of the minor.
(4) A grandparent of the minor if:
(A) there is no guardian or other representative described in
subdivision (1);
(B) a parent, an individual in loco parentis, or an adult sibling
is not reasonably available or declines to act; or
(C) the existence of the parent, individual in loco parentis, or
adult sibling is unknown to the health care provider after
reasonable efforts are made by the health care provider to
determine whether the minor has a parent, an individual in
loco parentis, or an adult sibling who is able to consent to the
treatment of the minor.
(c) A representative delegated authority to consent under section 6
2026 IN 1255—LS 6506/DI 104


of this chapter has the same authority and responsibility as the
individual delegating the authority.
(d) An individual authorized to consent for another under this
section shall act in good faith and in the best interest of the individual
incapable of consenting.
(e) If there are multiple individuals at the same priority level under
this section, those individuals shall make a reasonable effort to reach
a consensus as to the health care decisions on behalf of the individual
who is unable to provide health care consent. If the individuals at the
same priority level disagree as to the health care decisions on behalf of
the individual who is unable to provide health care consent, a majority
of the available individuals at the same priority level controls.
(f) This subsection does not apply to a minor described in
section 3(a)(2) of this chapter. It is hereby established that there is
a presumption that the continuation of life is in a minor's best
interests, including a minor who is born premature at less than
twenty (20) weeks gestation. A health care provider may not issue
a do not resuscitate order or otherwise withhold or withdraw
treatment that would allow the natural death of a minor unless the
health care provider has received the consent of each parent or
each legal guardian of the minor. Consent by each parent or each
legal guardian must be given orally and in writing to the health
care provider. The health care provider must have at least two (2)
witnesses attest that the consent was given by each parent or each
legal guardian. The health care provider shall document the
consent in the minor's medical record, specifying each parent or
legal guardian who gave consent. A parent or legal guardian may
revoke the consent at any time either orally or in writing.
(g) This subsection does not apply to a minor described in
section 3(a)(2) of this chapter. A health care provider may not
interfere with the efforts of a parent or legal guardian to obtain
other medical opinions or transfer the minor's care to another
health care provider. A health care provider may not hinder or
delay necessary medical measures for a minor, including a
tracheostomy or gastrostomy tube required to transfer a minor
patient's care to another health care provider. If the parent or legal
guardian of a minor requests a transfer for the minor patient's
care, the health care provider must continue to provide life
sustaining procedures, including nutrition and hydration, until the
transfer is made.
(h) This subsection does not apply to a minor described in
section 3(a)(2) of this chapter. A court does not have jurisdiction to
2026 IN 1255—LS 6506/DI 104


withdraw life sustaining procedures from a minor over the
objection of a parent or legal guardian.
2026 IN 1255—LS 6506/DI 104